Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5188HH (6) 91 da/jh H.F. 2209 Section 1. Section 262.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 39A. The board of regents and Iowa state 3 university shall adopt policies governing the admission of 4 students with an Iowa background to the college of veterinary 5 medicine as provided in chapter 266, subchapter VI. 6 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 266.61 Definitions. 7 As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise 8 requires: 9 1. âCollege of veterinary medicineâ or âcollegeâ means 10 Iowa state university of science and technology college of 11 veterinary medicine. 12 2. âDVM degree programâ means the four-year doctor of 13 veterinary medicine professional degree program administered by 14 the college of veterinary medicine. 15 3. âIowa graduate veterinarianâ means a person who has 16 received a doctor of veterinary medicine degree from the 17 college of veterinary medicine and becomes licensed to practice 18 veterinary medicine in this state under chapter 169. 19 4. âIowa residentâ means any of the following: 20 a. An individual who graduated from an Iowa high school. 21 b. An individual who has lived in Iowa for at least four 22 consecutive years immediately preceding the date the individual 23 would begin classes at the college. 24 5. âIowa rural communityâ means a county in the state with 25 a population of less than twenty-five thousand according to 26 the most recent decennial census released by the United States 27 census bureau. 28 6. âIowa state universityâ means Iowa state university of 29 science and technology. 30 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 266.62 Admissions policies ââ 31 objective. 32 The board of regents and Iowa state university shall 33 adopt policies governing the admission of students with Iowa 34 backgrounds to the college of veterinary medicine in its DVM 35 -1- LSB 5188HH (6) 91 da/jh 1/ 5 H.F. 2209 degree program who will become Iowa graduate veterinarians 1 entering private practice in an Iowa rural community. 2 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 266.63 Admissions policies ââ criteria 3 and preferences. 4 1. The board of regents and Iowa state university shall 5 adopt a policy requiring that not less than eighty percent 6 of the students who are admitted to the collegeâs DVM degree 7 program be Iowa residents or persons who were, prior to 8 applying to the college, enrolled in an eligible postsecondary 9 institution as defined in section 261E.2. 10 2. The board of regents and Iowa state university shall 11 adopt a policy providing a preference in admitting students to 12 the collegeâs DVM degree program who meet all of the following 13 criteria: 14 a. Declares an intention to elect a mixed animal option 15 track of college courses. 16 b. Declares an intention to enter private practice in an 17 Iowa rural community. 18 3. In evaluating applicants for admission to the collegeâs 19 DVM degree program, no consideration shall be given to a 20 test that purports to assess noncognitive skills, ethics, 21 and interpersonal traits, including but not limited to the 22 computer-based assessment for sampling personal characteristics 23 (CASPer) test. 24 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 266.64 Admissions policies ââ 25 application criteria. 26 The board of regents and Iowa state university shall adopt a 27 policy requiring an application for admission to the college in 28 the DVM degree program include in the application all of the 29 following: 30 1. Information regarding the applicantâs background 31 including an attestation that includes whether or not all of 32 the following apply: 33 a. That the applicant was born in Iowa or graduated from an 34 Iowa high school. 35 -2- LSB 5188HH (6) 91 da/jh 2/ 5 H.F. 2209 b. That the applicant has immediate family members or 1 in-laws who reside in Iowa. 2 c. That the applicant graduated from a public or private 3 university, a college, or a community college located in Iowa. 4 d. That the applicant resided in an Iowa rural community. 5 e. That the applicant resided in a rural community other 6 than an Iowa rural community, if all of the following apply: 7 (1) The applicantâs rural community had similar 8 characteristics to a similarly sized Iowa rural community. 9 (2) The applicantâs rural community experienced a lack of 10 private practicing veterinarians. 11 f. That none of the paragraphs âaâ through âeâ apply to the 12 applicant, but that the applicant is planning on becoming an 13 Iowa graduate licensed veterinarian. 14 g. That none of the paragraphs âa â through âfâ apply to the 15 applicant, but the applicant is interested in attending the 16 collegeâs DVM degree program. 17 2. A declaration that the applicant intends to do any of the 18 following: 19 a. Elect a mixed animal option track of courses. 20 b. Enter private practice in an Iowa rural community. 21 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 266.65 Admissions policies ââ report. 22 1. Iowa state university shall submit a college of 23 veterinary medicine admission report to the governor and 24 general assembly by January 15 of each year. 25 2. The report described in subsection 1 shall include all 26 of the following: 27 a. The number of applicants who are Iowa residents who were 28 accepted to the collegeâs DVM degree program, and the number of 29 those applicants that were admitted and not admitted, including 30 as a percentage. The report shall include a brief statement 31 explaining why each applicant was not admitted. 32 b. The number of applicants who were, prior to applying 33 to the college, enrolled in an eligible postsecondary 34 institution as defined in section 261E.2, and the number of 35 -3- LSB 5188HH (6) 91 da/jh 3/ 5 H.F. 2209 those applicants that were admitted and not admitted, including 1 as a percentage. The report shall include a brief statement 2 explaining why each applicant was not admitted. 3 c. The number of applicants who declared an intention to 4 elect a mixed animal option track of college courses and the 5 number of those applicants that were admitted and not admitted, 6 including as a percentage. The report shall include a brief 7 statement explaining why each applicant was not admitted. 8 d. The number of applicants who declared an intention to 9 enter private practice in an Iowa rural community and the 10 number of those applicants that were admitted and not admitted, 11 including as a percentage. The report shall include a brief 12 statement explaining why each applicant was not admitted. 13 3. Personal information regarding an applicant in an 14 annual report submitted pursuant to this section shall be kept 15 confidential as required under the federal Family Educational 16 Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. Â§1232g, and in the same 17 manner as personal information in student records maintained, 18 created, collected, or assembled by or for a school corporation 19 or educational institution in accordance with section 22.7, 20 subsection 1. 21 Sec. 7. DIRECTIONS TO CODE EDITOR. The Code editor is 22 directed to arrange the following sections in chapter 266, as 23 enacted by this Act, into a new subchapter VI: 24 Sections 266.61 through 266.70. 25